Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB638.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Part IV of Title 12 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 59MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSec.5901. Confession of judgment provisions prohibited.§ 5901. Confession of judgment provisions prohibited.(a) Prohibition.--A contract or agreement entered into between parties may not contain a provision that authorizes one party to confess judgment against another party to the contract or agreement.(b) Exceptions.--Subsection (a) does not apply to a contract or agreement entered into:123456789101112131415161718 (1) prior to the effective date of this section; or(2) by the Commonwealth or a municipality pursuant to statute.(c) Effect.--A confession of judgment provision in violation of this section is void and unenforceable.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0638PN0648 - 2 - 123456